Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-752
Violations; penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act and sections
54-701 to 54-753 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor for the
first violation and a Class I misdemeanor for any subsequent violation.

Laws 1927, c. 12, art. VIII, § 13, p. 95;

C.S.1929, § 54-950;

R.S.1943, § 54-752;

Laws 1953, c. 184, § 8, p. 581;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 25;

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 18;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 23;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 11.

Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, see section 54-7,105.